Idaho, session 2025, S1184.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 18-604, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
18-604. DEFINITIONS. As used in this chapter:
(1) "Abortion" means the use of any means to intentionally terminate
the clinically diagnosable pregnancy of a woman with knowledge that the ter-
mination by those means will, with reasonable likelihood, cause the death
of the unborn child except that, for the purposes of this chapter, abortion
shall not mean:
(a) The use of an intrauterine device or birth control pill to inhibit
or prevent ovulations, fertilization, or the implantation of a fertil-
ized ovum within the uterus;
(b) The removal of a dead unborn child;
(c) The removal of an ectopic or molar pregnancy; or
(d) The treatment of a woman who is no longer pregnant.
(2) "Department" means the Idaho department of health and welfare.
(3) "Down syndrome" means a chromosomal disorder associated either
with an extra chromosome 21, in whole or in part, or an effective trisomy for
chromosome 21. Down syndrome is sometimes referred to as "trisomy 21."
(4) "Emancipated" means any minor who has been married or is in active
military service.
(5) "Fetus" and "unborn child." Each term means an individual organism
of the species Homo sapiens from fertilization until live birth.
(6) "First trimester of pregnancy" means the first thirteen (13) weeks
of a pregnancy.
(7) "Hospital" means an acute care general hospital in this state, li-
censed as provided in chapter 13, title 39, Idaho Code.
(8) "Informed consent" means a voluntary and knowing decision to un-
dergo a specific procedure or treatment. To be voluntary, the decision must
be made freely after sufficient time for contemplation and without coercion
by any person. To be knowing, the decision must be based on the physician's
accurate and substantially complete explanation of:
(a) A description of any proposed treatment or procedure;


(b) Any reasonably foreseeable complications and risks to the patient
from such procedure, including those related to reproductive health;
and
(c) The manner in which such procedure and its foreseeable complica-
tions and risks compare with those of each readily available alterna-
tive to such procedure, including childbirth and adoption.
The physician must provide the information in terms that can be understood by
the person making the decision, with consideration of age, level of maturity
and intellectual capability.
(9) "Lethal fetal anomaly" means a profound and irreversible congeni-
tal anomaly, birth defect, or genetic abnormality that is incompatible with
sustained life after birth. The term does not include the numerous birth de-
fects, chromosomal abnormalities, or genetic mutations that are compatible
with extended survival after birth, such as Down syndrome.
(9) (10) "Medical emergency" means a condition that, on the basis of the
physician's good faith clinical judgment, so complicates the medical con-
dition of a pregnant woman as to necessitate the immediate abortion of her
pregnancy to avert her death or for which a delay will create serious risk of
substantial and irreversible impairment of a major bodily function.
(10) (11) "Minor" means a woman under eighteen (18) years of age.
(11) (12) "Pregnant" and "pregnancy." Each term shall mean the repro-
ductive condition of having a developing fetus in the body and commences with
fertilization.
(12) (13) "Physician" means a person licensed to practice medicine and
surgery or osteopathic medicine and surgery in this state as provided in
chapter 18, title 54, Idaho Code.
(13) (14) "Second trimester of pregnancy" means that portion of a preg-
nancy following the thirteenth week and preceding the point in time when
the fetus becomes viable, and there is hereby created a legal presump-
tion that the second trimester does not end before the commencement of the
twenty-fifth week of pregnancy, upon which presumption any licensed physi-
cian may proceed in lawfully aborting a patient pursuant to section 18-608,
Idaho Code, in which case the same shall be conclusive and unrebuttable in
all civil or criminal proceedings.
(14) (15) "Third trimester of pregnancy" means that portion of a preg-
nancy from and after the point in time when the fetus becomes viable.
(15) (16) Any reference to a viable fetus shall be construed to mean a
fetus potentially able to live outside the mother's womb, albeit with arti-
ficial aid.
SECTION 2. That Section 18-622, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
18-622. DEFENSE OF LIFE ACT. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2)
of this section, every person who performs or attempts to perform an abortion
as defined in this chapter commits the crime of criminal abortion. Crimi-
nal abortion shall be a felony punishable by a sentence of imprisonment of no
less than two (2) years and no more than five (5) years in prison. The profes-
sional license of any health care professional who performs or attempts to
perform an abortion or who assists in performing or attempting to perform an
abortion in violation of this subsection shall be suspended by the appropri-


ate licensing board for a minimum of six (6) months upon a first offense and
shall be permanently revoked upon a subsequent offense.
(2) The following shall not be considered criminal abortions for pur-
poses of subsection (1) of this section:
(a) The abortion was performed or attempted by a physician as defined in
this chapter and:
(i) The physician determined, in his good faith medical judgment
and based on the facts known to the physician at the time, that the
abortion was necessary to prevent the death of the pregnant woman.
No abortion shall be deemed necessary to prevent the death of the
pregnant woman because the physician believes that the woman may
or will take action to harm herself; and
(ii) The physician performed or attempted to perform the abortion
in the manner that, in his good faith medical judgment and based
on the facts known to the physician at the time, provided the best
opportunity for the unborn child to survive, unless, in his good
faith medical judgment, termination of the pregnancy in that man-
ner would have posed a greater risk of the death of the pregnant
woman. No such greater risk shall be deemed to exist because the
physician believes that the woman may or will take action to harm
herself; or
(b) The abortion was performed or attempted by a physician as defined in
this chapter, and the physician determined, in his reasonable medical
judgment, that the abortion was necessary to prevent a serious health
risk to the mother. For the purposes of this section, "serious health
risk" means a medical condition that, in the absence of medical atten-
tion, could reasonably be expected to result in substantial impairment
of a major bodily function, including any harm that would render the
mother unable to conceive or carry a pregnancy in the future. No abor-
tion shall be deemed necessary to prevent a serious health risk to the
pregnant woman because the physician believes that the woman may or will
take action to harm herself;
(c) The abortion was performed or attempted by a physician as defined in
this chapter before the third trimester of pregnancy, and:
(i) Two (2) physicians have certified in writing that, in such
physician's reasonable medical judgment, the fetus was diagnosed
with a lethal fetal anomaly; and
(ii) Prior to performing the abortion, the physician informed
the woman both verbally and in writing that perinatal hospice and
perinatal palliative care services are available as an alterna-
tive to abortion; or
(b) (d) The abortion was performed or attempted by a physician as de-
fined in this chapter during the first trimester of pregnancy and:
(i) If the woman is not a minor or subject to a guardianship, then,
prior to the performance of the abortion, the woman has reported to
a law enforcement agency that she is the victim of an act of rape or
incest and provided a copy of such report to the physician who is
to perform the abortion. The copy of the report shall remain a con-
fidential part of the woman's medical record subject to applicable
privacy laws; or


(ii) If the woman is a minor or subject to a guardianship, then,
prior to the performance of the abortion, the woman or her parent
or guardian has reported to a law enforcement agency or child pro-
tective services that she is the victim of an act of rape or incest
and a copy of such report has been provided to the physician who is
to perform the abortion. The copy of the report shall remain a con-
fidential part of the woman's medical record subject to applicable
privacy laws.
(3) If a report concerning an act of rape or incest is made to a law
enforcement agency or child protective services pursuant to subsection
(2)(b)(d) of this section, then the person who made the report shall, upon
request, be entitled to receive a copy of such report within seventy-two (72)
hours of the report being made, provided that the report may be redacted as
necessary to avoid interference with an investigation.
(4) Medical treatment provided to a pregnant woman by a health care pro-
fessional as defined in this chapter that results in the accidental death of,
or unintentional injury to, the unborn child shall not be a violation of this
section.
(5) Nothing in this section shall be construed to subject a pregnant
woman on whom any abortion is performed or attempted to any criminal convic-
tion and penalty.
SECTION 3. That Section 18-617, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
18-617. CHEMICAL ABORTIONS. (1) As used in this section:
(a) "Abortifacient" means mifepristone, misoprostol and/or other
chemical or drug dispensed with the intent of causing an abortion as de-
fined in section 18-604(1), Idaho Code. Nothing in the definition shall
apply when used to treat ectopic pregnancy;
(b) "Chemical abortion" means the exclusive use of an abortifacient or
combination of abortifacients to effect an abortion;
(c) "Physician" has the same meaning as provided in section 18-604(12),
Idaho Code.
(2) No physician shall give, sell, dispense, administer, prescribe or
otherwise provide an abortifacient for the purpose of effecting a chemical
abortion unless the physician:
(a) Has the ability to assess the duration of the pregnancy accurately
in accordance with the applicable standard of care for medical practice
in the state;
(b) Has determined, if clinically feasible, that the unborn child to be
aborted is within the uterus and not ectopic;
(c) Has the ability to provide surgical intervention in cases of incom-
plete abortion or severe bleeding, or, if the physician does not have
admitting privileges at a local hospital, has made and documented in the
patient's medical record plans to provide such emergency care through
other qualified physicians who have agreed in writing to provide such
care;
(d) Informs the patient that she may need access to medical facilities
equipped to provide blood transfusions and resuscitation, if neces-
sary, as a result of or in connection with the abortion procedure on a


twenty-four (24) hour basis. If the appropriate medical facility is
other than a local hospital emergency room, the physician shall provide
the patient with the name, address and telephone number of such facility
in writing; and
(e) Has complied with the informed consent provisions of section
18-609, Idaho Code.
(3) The physician inducing the abortion, or a person acting on behalf of
the physician inducing the abortion, shall make reasonable efforts to ensure
that the patient returns for a follow-up visit so that a physician can con-
firm that the pregnancy has been terminated and assess the patient's medical
condition.
SECTION 4. That Section 18-8804, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
18-8804. ABORTION FOLLOWING DETECTION OF A FETAL HEARTBEAT PROHIB-
ITED. (1) A person may not perform an abortion on a pregnant woman when a
fetal heartbeat has been detected, except in the case of a medical emergency,
in the case of a lethal fetal anomaly pursuant to the provisions of section
18-622, Idaho Code, in the case of rape as defined in section 18-6101, Idaho
Code, or in the case of incest as described in section 18-6601, Idaho Code.
In the case of rape or incest:
(a) If the woman is not a minor or subject to guardianship, then, prior
to the performance of the abortion, the woman has reported the act of
rape or incest to a law enforcement agency and provided a copy of such
report to the physician who is to perform the abortion; or
(b) If the woman is a minor or subject to guardianship, then, prior to
the performance of the abortion, the woman or her parent or guardian has
reported the act of rape or incest to a law enforcement agency or child
protective services and a copy of such report have been provided to the
physician who is to perform the abortion.
(2) Nothing in this section recognizes a right to abortion before a fe-
tal heartbeat is detected.
SECTION 5. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.